Tennessee, session 114, HB2023.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 40-24-109, is amended by deleting
subsection (c) and substituting instead the following:
(c) The clerks of all courts of general sessions, circuit and criminal courts,
municipal courts exercising general sessions court jurisdiction, and any other court
exercising similar criminal jurisdiction shall collect a victims assistance assessment in
the sum of one hundred twenty-five dollars ($125) from a person who:
(1) Enters a plea of guilty;
(2) Is found guilty by a judge or jury;
(3) Enters a plea of nolo contendere;
(4) Enters a plea, pursuant to a diversionary sentencing statute, to a
criminal offense described in subsection (d);
(5) Is found guilty, or enters a plea of guilty or nolo contendere, to the
offense of attempting or conspiring to commit an offense described in subsection
(d); or
(6) Is found to be criminally responsible as principal for the commission
of an offense described in subsection (d).
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 40-24-109(g)(1), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting:
HB2023
010968
- 1 -

(1) The victims assistance assessment is subject to § 8-21-401 and is in addition
to all other taxes, costs, and fines. The first fifteen dollars ($15.00) of each assessment
must be paid to the clerk of the court imposing the assessment for processing and
handling. The remaining one hundred ten dollars ($110) must be transmitted to the
county in which the offense occurred for the exclusive use of the victims assistance
program previously designated by the county legislative body.
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 010968